Utah statutes.
34-44-201.   Written business relationship.
(1)  The business relationship between a sales representative and a principal
shall be in a writing signed by both the principal and the sales
representative.
(2)  The writing required by Subsection (1) shall set forth the method by
which the sales representative's commission is:
(a)  computed; and
(b)  paid.
(3)  The principal shall provide the sales representative with a copy of the
signed writing required by Subsection (1).
